bhojpuri.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ॊऀऄअआइईउऊऋऌऍऎएऐऑऒओऔकखगघङचछजझञटठडढणतथदधनऩपफबभमयरऱलळऴवशषसहऺऻऽािढ़फ़य़ॠॡॢॣॱॲॳॴॵॶॷॸॹॺॻॼॽॾ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" c="Noun" />
    <sdef n="sg" c="Singular" />
    <sdef n="pl" c="Plural" />
    <sdef n="m" c="Masculine" />   
    <sdef n="f" c="Feminine" />   
    <sdef n="o" c="Oblique" />
    <sdef n="d" c="Direct" />
    <sdef n="p3" c="Third Person" />
    <sdef n="p2" c="Second Person" />
    <sdef n="p1" c="First Person" />
    <sdef n="eo" c="Emphasis with only" />
    <sdef n="ea" c="Emphasis with also" />
    <sdef n="rednt" c="Informal Noun" />
    <sdef n="adj" c="Adjective" />
    <sdef n="advb" c="Adverb" />
    <sdef n="v" c="Verb" />    
    <sdef n="pn" c="Pronoun" />    
    <sdef n="hon" c="Honirific" />    
    <sdef n="rdp" c="RDP" />    
    <sdef n="dex" c="Dex" />    
    <sdef n="neg" c="Negative" />    
    <sdef n="mood" c="Mood" />    
    <sdef n="mood1" c="Mood" />    
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="लड़िक/ा__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>न</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>न</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="राज/ा__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>न</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="घर__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="d" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="d" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>न</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="खर्च__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="d" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="d" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>न</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="कवि__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="d" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="d" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>न</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="आदम/ी__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िन</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="सत्रु__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="d" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="d" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>न</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="आल/ू__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ू</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ू</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ू</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुन</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="कुवँ/ा__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>न</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="लड़िक">
      <i>लड़िक</i>
      <par n="लड़िक/ा__n_m" />
    </e>
    <e lm="राज">
      <i>राज</i>
      <par n="राज/ा__n_m" />
    </e>
    <e lm="घर">
      <i>घर</i>
      <par n="घर__n_m" />
    </e>
    <e lm="खर्च">
      <i>खर्च</i>
      <par n="घर__n_m" />
    </e>
    <e lm="कवि">
      <i>कवि</i>
      <par n="घर__n_m" />
    </e>
    <e lm="आदम">
      <i>आदम</i>
      <par n="आदम/ी__n_m" />
    </e>
    <e lm="सत्रु">
      <i>सत्रु</i>
      <par n="सत्रु__n_m" />
    </e>
    <e lm="आल">
      <i>आल</i>
      <par n="आल/ू__n_m" />
    </e>
    <e lm="कुवँ">
      <i>कुवँ</i>
      <par n="कुवँ/ा__n_m" />
    </e>
